Utah statutes.
58-1-503.   Maximum civil penalty for violation of court order.

(1)  If any written order issued under this title or if an injunction or temporary restraining order  issued by a court of competent jurisdiction relating to this title is violated, the court may impose a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each day the written order, injunction, or temporary restraining order is violated, if the person in violation has received notice of the written order, injunction, or temporary restraining order.

(2)  All penalties ordered under this section shall be  deposited into the General Fund.

